Illinois, session 104th, HB1338.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Universal Recognition of Occupational Licenses Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Board" means a government agency, board, department, or 8other government entity that regulates a lawful occupation and 9issues an occupational license or government certification to 10an individual.11    "Government certification" means a voluntary, 12government-granted, and nontransferable recognition to an 13individual who meets personal qualifications related to a 14lawful occupation that upon the government's initial and 15continuing approval, the individual may use "government 16certified" or "state certified" as a title. "Government 17certification" does not mean "occupational license." 18"Government certification" does not include credentials, such 19as those used for medical-board certification or held by a 20certified public accountant, that are prerequisites to working 21lawfully in an occupation.22    "Lawful occupation" means a course of conduct, pursuit, or 23profession that includes the sale of goods or services that   HB1338- 2 -LRB104 03313 AAS 13335 b1are not themselves illegal to sell, irrespective of whether 2the individual selling them is subject to an occupational 3license.4    "Military" means the Armed Forces of the United States 5including the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, 6Navy, Space Force, National Guard, and all reserve components 7and auxiliaries. "Military" includes the military reserves and 8militia of any United States territory or state. 9    "Occupational license" is a nontransferable authorization 10by law for an individual to perform exclusively a lawful 11occupation based on meeting personal qualifications. 12"Occupational license" includes a military occupational 13specialty.14    "Other state" or "another state" means any territory or 15state other than this State in the United States. It also means 16any branch or unit of the military.17    "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, 18processes, and work that a person may perform under an 19occupational license or government certification issued in 20this State. 21    Section 10. Recognition of another occupational license or 22government certification.23    (a) Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, a 24board shall issue an occupational license or government 25certification to a person upon application if all the   HB1338- 3 -LRB104 03313 AAS 13335 b1following apply:2        (1) The person holds a current and valid occupational 3    license or government certification in another state in a 4    lawful occupation with a similar scope of practice, as 5    determined by the relevant board in this State;6        (2) The person has held the occupational license or 7    government certification in the other state for at least 8    one year;9        (3) The board in the other state required the person 10    to pass an examination or to meet education, training or 11    experience standards;12        (4) The board in the other state holds the person in 13    good standing;14        (5) The person does not have a disqualifying criminal 15    record as determined by the relevant board in this State 16    under State law;17        (6) No board in another state revoked the person's 18    occupational license or government certification because 19    of negligence or intentional misconduct related to the 20    person's work in the occupation;21        (7) The person did not surrender the occupational 22    license or government certification because of negligence 23    or intentional misconduct related to the person's work in 24    the occupation in another state;25        (8) The person does not have a complaint, allegation, 26    or investigation pending before a board in another state   HB1338- 4 -LRB104 03313 AAS 13335 b1    which relates to unprofessional conduct or an alleged 2    crime. If the person has a complaint, allegation, or 3    investigation pending, then the relevant board in this 4    State may not issue or deny an occupational license or 5    government certification to the person until the 6    complaint, allegation, or investigation is resolved or the 7    person otherwise meets the criteria for an occupational 8    license or government certification in this State to the 9    satisfaction of the relevant board in this State; and10        (9) The person pays all applicable fees to the State.11    (b) If another state issued the person a government 12certification but the relevant board in this State requires an 13occupational license to work, then the relevant board in this 14State shall issue an occupational license to the person if the 15person otherwise satisfies subsection (a). 16    Section 15. Recognition of work experience. 17Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, a board 18shall issue an occupational license or government 19certification to a person upon application based on work 20experience in another state if all the following apply:21        (1) The person worked in a state that does not use an 22    occupational license or government certification to 23    regulate a lawful occupation, but this State uses an 24    occupational license or government certification to 25    regulate a lawful occupation with a similar scope of   HB1338- 5 -LRB104 03313 AAS 13335 b1    practice, as determined by the relevant board;2        (2) The person worked for at least 3 years in the 3    lawful occupation; and 4        (3) The person satisfies paragraphs (5), (6), (7), 5    (8), and (9) of subsection (a) of Section 10. 6    Section 20. State law examination. A board may require a 7person to pass a jurisprudential examination specific to 8relevant State laws that regulate the occupation if an 9occupational license or government certification in this State 10requires a person to pass a jurisprudential examination 11specific to relevant State statutes and administrative rules 12that regulate the occupation. 13    Section 25. Decision. A board shall provide the person 14with a written decision regarding the application within 30 15days after receiving a complete application. 16    Section 30. Appeal.17    (a) The person may appeal a board's decision to a court of 18general jurisdiction.19    (b) The person may appeal a board's: 20        (1) denial of an occupational license or government 21    certification;22        (2) determination of the occupation; 23        (3) determination of the similarity of the scope of   HB1338- 6 -LRB104 03313 AAS 13335 b1    practice of the occupational license or government 2    certification issued; or 3        (4) other determinations under this Act. 4    Section 35. State laws and jurisdiction. A person who 5obtains an occupational license or government certification 6pursuant to this Act is subject to:7        (1) the laws regulating the occupation in this State; 8    and 9        (2) the jurisdiction of the relevant board in this 10    State. 11    Section 40. Exception. This Act does not apply to an 12occupation regulated by the Illinois Supreme Court. 13    Section 45. Limitations.14    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit a 15person from applying for an occupational license or government 16certification under another statute or rule in State law.17    (b) An occupational license or government certification 18issued pursuant to this Act is valid only in this State. It 19does not make the person eligible to work in another state 20under an interstate compact or reciprocity agreement unless 21otherwise provided by law.22    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent this 23State from entering into a licensing compact or reciprocity   HB1338- 7 -LRB104 03313 AAS 13335 b1agreement with another state, foreign province, or foreign 2country.3    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent this 4State from recognizing occupational credentials issued by a 5private certification organization, foreign province, foreign 6country, international organization, or other entity.7    (e) Nothing in this Act may be construed to require a 8private certification organization to grant or deny private 9certification to any individual. 10    Section 50. Application fees. A board may charge a fee, 11not to exceed $100, to an applicant to recoup its costs for 12each application. 13    Section 55. Emergency powers.14    (a) During a declared emergency, the Governor may order 15the recognition of an occupational license from another state 16or foreign country as if the license was issued by this State.17    (b) The Governor may expand any license's scope of 18practice and may authorize any licensee to provide services in 19this State in person, telephonically, or by other means for 20the duration of the emergency. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.